Illinois, session 104th, HB4166.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Commerce and Economic 5Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois 6is amended by adding Section 605-1120 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 605/605-1120 new)8    Sec. 605-1120. High School and Area Vocational Center 9Grant Program.10    (a) The High School and Area Vocational Center Grant 11Program is hereby established as a program to be implemented 12and administered by the Department. The Program shall provide 13grants for the purposes described in subsections (b) and (c).14    (b) Subject to appropriation, the Department shall award 15grants to high schools, area vocational centers, and area 16career centers for the instruction and training of 17preapprenticeship students in clean energy industry 18occupations and construction industry occupations, including 19instruction and training for careers as wind turbine 20technicians; solar installers; construction craft laborers; 21carpenters; electricians; plumbers or pipefitters; masons; 22welders or ironworkers; heavy equipment operators; roofers; 23sheet metal workers; painters and drywall installers; heating,   HB4166- 2 -LRB104 15253 HLH 28403 b1ventilation, and air conditioning (HVAC) technicians; and 2other trades.3    (c) The Department shall adopt, by rule, criteria for the 4awarding of grants under this Section for the following 5purposes:6        (1) to open the doors of opportunity into the clean 7    energy industry, the construction industry, and the 8    trades;9        (2) to quickly and efficiently create, throughout the 10    State, a qualified talent pipeline to fill job 11    opportunities in the clean energy industry and the 12    construction industry with diverse candidates;13        (3) to allow students to attend and graduate from the 14    instruction and training under this Section tuition-free; 15    and16        (4) to encourage diversity and inclusion in the clean 17    energy industry and the construction industry.18    (d) The Department shall adopt all rules necessary for the 19implementation and administration of the Program established 20under this Section.